Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.440

Educational materials on nationwide 988 phone number—Veterans crisis line and resources.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall consult with the department of veterans affairs to create educational materials informing health care providers regulated under this chapter about the availability of the nationwide 988 phone number for individuals in crisis to connect with suicide prevention and mental health crisis counselors. The educational materials must include information about the veterans crisis line for veterans and service members, and, beginning July 1, 2023, information about the resources developed under RCW 43.60A.280.

(2) The department shall:

(a) Determine the health professions to which this section shall apply; and

(b) Collaborate with the corresponding disciplining authority under RCW 18.130.020 to ensure that the educational materials are distributed electronically to appropriate licensed health care providers when a provider renews his or her license.

(3) Beginning July 1, 2023, all health care providers are strongly encouraged to inquire with new patients entering care whether the patient is a veteran, member of the military, or a family member of a veteran or member of the military. If the patient responds in the affirmative, the provider is encouraged to share the educational materials created under this section with the patient.

[ 2022 c 191 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2022 c 191: See note following RCW 43.60A.260.